Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-29] Relationship to Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. The provisions of this
chapter governing the legal effect, validity, and enforceability of electronic
records or electronic signatures, and of contracts performed with the use of
such records or signatures conform to the requirements of section 102 of the
Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, Public Law 106-229.
[L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next